Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.180

Mathematics college readiness test—Costs.

(1) Subject to funding appropriated for this purpose and beginning in the fall of 2009, school districts shall provide all high school students enrolled in the district the option of taking the mathematics college readiness test developed under *RCW 28B.10.679 once at no cost to the students. Districts shall encourage, but not require, students to take the test in their junior or senior year of high school.

(2) Subject to funding appropriated for this purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall reimburse each district for the costs incurred by the district in providing students the opportunity to take the mathematics placement test.

[ 2007 c 396 s 11; (2009 c 556 s 13 expired July 1, 2011).]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28B.10.679 was amended by 2015 c 55 s 206, removing the mathematics college readiness test.

Expiration date—2009 c 556 ss 11, 13, and 15: See note following RCW 28A.300.525.

Captions not law—2007 c 396: See note following RCW 28A.305.215.

Finding—Intent—2007 c 396: See note following RCW 28A.188.020.